Texas, session 891, SB63.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 151.318(b), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (b)  The exemption includes: (1)  chemicals, catalysts, and other materials that are used during a manufacturing, processing, or fabrication operation to produce or induce a chemical or physical change, to remove impurities, or to make the product more marketable; (2)  semiconductor fabrication cleanrooms and equipment; [and] (3)  pharmaceutical biotechnology cleanrooms and equipment that are installed as part of the construction of a new facility on which construction began after July 1, 2003; and (4)  unprocessed sand, dirt, and gravel used in the manufacture of hydrocarbons, which may undergo non-processing activities that include gathering, scooping, shaking, sorting, and washing, unless some method is used to produce a chemical change in the material through these activities. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution.  If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.